Hawaii statutes.
[§414D-206] Bequests, devises, and gifts.
Any bequest, devise, gift, grant, or promise contained in a will or other
instrument of donation, subscription, or conveyance, that is made to a
constituent corporation and that takes effect or remains payable after the
merger, inures to the surviving corporation unless the will or other instrument
otherwise specifically provides. [L 2001, c 105, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next